Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2650
Violations; severity of penalty; considerations.

Whenever a violation of the Pesticide Act has occurred, the following shall be considered when determining the severity or amount of any administrative or civil fine, the issuance of a cease and desist order, or the disposition of any license:

(1) The culpability and good faith of and any past violations by such person;

(2) The seriousness of the violation, including the amount of any actual or potential risk to human health or environment; and

(3) The extent to which the person derived financial gain as a result of permitting or committing the violation, including a determination of the size of the company itself and the impact on it.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 29.